Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1431.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 353.30, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 353.30. A. The use of agreements in the practice of


pharmacy shall be acceptable within the rules promulgated by the


State Board of Pharmacy and in consultation with the State Board of


Medical Licensure and Supervision and the State Board of Osteopathic


Examiners.


B. 1. The State Board of Pharmacy shall develop and prepare


permanent rules relating to training requirements and administration


of immunizations and therapeutic injections in consultation within


the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision and the State


Board of Osteopathic Examiners.

Req. No. 3034 Page 1


C. 2. A pharmacist who has completed a requisite course of


training as approved by the State Board of Pharmacy in consultation


with the State Board of Medical Licensure and Supervision and the


State Board of Osteopathic Examiners may administer therapeutic


injections on orders from a licensed prescriber, and may administer


immunizations that have been approved or authorized by the United


States Food and Drug Administration without a patient-specific


prescription, standing order or similar arrangement.


C. 1. A pharmacist may dispense self-administered hormonal


contraceptives to a patient under the protocol established under


paragraph 2 of this subsection, regardless of whether the patient


has obtained a prescription.


2. The State Board of Pharmacy shall promulgate rules


establishing a protocol for the dispensing of self-administered


hormonal contraceptives not later than January 1, 2027.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3034 DC 1/6/2026 2:46:09 PM













Req. No. 3034 Page 2